North Carolina, session 2025, HB1149.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Effective October 1, 2026, Chapter 96 of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new Article to read:
"Article 6.
"Short-Time Compensation.
"§ 96-45. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Affected unit. – A specific plant, department, shift, or other definable unit of
an employing unit that has at least two employees to which an approved
short-time compensation plan applies.
(2) Approved short-time compensation plan. – A plan that is approved by the
Division as provided by this Article.
(3) Health and retirement benefits. – Employer-provided health benefits and
retirement benefits under a defined benefit pension plan as defined in section
414(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, contributions under a defined
contribution plan as defined in section 414(i) of the Internal Revenue Code,
or that are incidents of employment in addition to the cash remuneration
earned.
(4) Program. – Short-time compensation program established pursuant to this
Article.
(5) Short-time compensation. – The unemployment benefits payable to
employees in an affected unit under an approved short-time compensation
plan, as distinguished from the unemployment benefits otherwise payable
under the unemployment compensation provisions of State law.
(6) Short-time compensation plan. – A plan submitted by an employer for
approval by an affected unit of the employer to avert layoffs.
(7) Unemployment compensation. – The unemployment benefits payable under
this Article other than short-time compensation and includes any amounts
payable pursuant to an agreement under any federal law providing for
compensation, assistance, or allowances with respect to unemployment.
*H1149-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) Usual weekly hours of work. – The usual hours of work for full-time or
part-time employees in the affected unit when that unit is operating on its
regular basis, not to exceed 40 hours and not including hours of overtime
work.
"§ 96-46. Application to participate in short-time compensation program.
(a) An employer that wishes to participate in the Program shall submit to the Division a
signed, written short-time compensation plan for approval. The Division shall develop an
application form to request approval of a plan and an approval process. The application shall
include:
(1) The affected unit or units covered by the plan, including the number of
full-time or part-time workers in the unit, identification of each individual
employee in the affected unit by name, social security number, and the
employer's unemployment tax account number, and any other information
required by the Division to identify plan participants.
(2) A description of how workers in the affected unit will be notified of the
employer's participation in the plan if the application is approved, including
how the employer will notify those workers in a collective bargaining unit, as
well as any workers in the affected unit who are not in a collective bargaining
unit. If the employer will not provide advance notice to workers in the affected
unit, the employer shall explain in a statement in the application why it is not
feasible to provide the notice.
(3) A requirement that the employer identify the usual weekly hours of work for
employees in the affected unit and the specific percentage by which their
hours will be reduced during all weeks covered by the plan. An application
shall specify the overall work reduction for which a short-time compensation
application may be approved, which shall be not less than ten percent (10%)
and not more than sixty percent (60%) of the usual work hours during that
period. If the plan includes any week for which the employer regularly
provides no work due to a holiday or other plant closing, then the week shall
be identified in the application. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this
subdivision, an employer shall be allowed some weeks of complete plant
shutdown in appropriate industries or given certain modes of operation.
(4) Certification by the employer that, if the employer provides health benefits
and retirement benefits to any employee whose usual weekly hours of work
are reduced under the Program, the benefits will continue to be provided to
employees participating in the Program under the same terms and conditions
as though the usual weekly hours of the employee had not been reduced or to
the same extent as other employees not participating in the Program. For
defined benefit retirement plans, the hours that are reduced under the plan
shall be credited for purposes of participation, vesting, and accrual of benefits
as though the usual weekly hours of work had not been reduced. The dollar
amount of employer contributions to a defined contribution plan that are based
on a percentage of compensation may be less due to the reduction in the
employee's compensation. However, an application may contain the required
certification when a reduction in health and retirement benefits scheduled to
occur during the duration of the plan will be applicable equally to employees
who are not participating in the Program and to those employees who are
participating.
(5) Certification by the employer that the aggregate reduction in work hours is in
lieu of layoffs, whether temporary or permanent layoffs or both.
(6) Agreement by the employer to do all of the following:
Page 2 House Bill 1149-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. Furnish reports to the Division relating to the proper conduct of the
plan.
b. Allow the Division access to all records necessary to approve or
disapprove the plan application and, after approval of the plan, monitor
and evaluate the plan.
c. Follow any other directives the Division deems necessary for the
agency to implement the plan and that are consistent with the
requirements for plan applications.
(7) Certification by the employer that participation in the plan and its
implementation is consistent with the employer's obligations under applicable
federal and State laws.
(8) Certification by the employer that any affected collective bargaining unit
agrees with the plan.
(9) The effective date and duration of the plan, which shall expire no later than
the end of the twelfth full calendar month after the effective date.
(10) Any other provision added to the application by the Division that the U.S.
Secretary of Labor determines to be appropriate for the purpose of this
Program.
(b) Regarding employers in appropriate industries or that have certain modes of
operation, and only if the employer demonstrates good cause, the Division may allow flexibility
in the application process in cases where it is reasonable not to require specific dates and hours
in the application, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section.
(c) To be eligible to participate in the Program, the employer must have no contributions,
penalties, or interest outstanding under G.S. 96-10.
"§ 96-47. Approval and disapproval of plan.
The Division shall approve or disapprove a short-time compensation plan in writing within
30 days of its receipt and promptly communicate the decision to the employer. A decision
disapproving the plan shall clearly identify the reasons for the disapproval. The disapproval shall
be final, but the employer shall be allowed to submit another plan for approval not earlier than
90 days from the date of the disapproval.
"§ 96-48. Effective date and duration of plan.
A short-time compensation plan shall be effective on the date that is mutually agreed upon
by the employer and the Division, which shall be specified in the notice of approval to the
employer. The plan shall expire on the date specified in the notice of approval, which shall be
either the date at the end of the twelfth full calendar month after its effective date or an earlier
date mutually agreed upon by the employer and the Division. However, if a short-time
compensation plan is revoked under G.S. 96-49, the plan shall terminate on the date specified in
the Division's written order of revocation. An employer may terminate a plan at any time upon
written notice to the Division. Upon receipt of notice from the employer, the Division shall
promptly notify each member of the affected unit of the termination date. An employer may
submit a new application to participate in another plan at any time after the expiration or
termination date.
"§ 96-49. Revocation of approval of plan.
(a) The Division may revoke approval of a short-time compensation plan for good cause
at any time. The revocation order shall be in writing and shall specify the reasons for the
revocation and the date the revocation is effective. The Division shall state clearly the reasons
for the revocation.
(b) The Division may periodically review the operation of each employer's plan to assure
that no good cause exists for revocation of the approval of the plan. Good cause shall include,
but not be limited to, failure to comply with the assurances given in the plan, unreasonable
revision of productivity standards for the affected unit, conduct or occurrences tending to defeat
House Bill 1149-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the intent and effective operation of the plan, and violation of any criteria on which approval of
the plan was based.
"§ 96-50. Modification of approved plan.
(a) An employer may request a modification of an approved plan by filing a written
request to the Division. The request shall identify the specific provisions proposed to be modified
and provide an explanation of why the proposed modification is appropriate for the plan. The
Division shall approve or disapprove the proposed modification in writing within 30 days of
receipt and promptly communicate the decision to the employer.
(b) The Division, in its discretion, may approve a request for modification of the plan
based on conditions that have changed since the plan was approved, provided that the
modification is consistent with and supports the purposes for which the plan was initially
approved. A modification shall not extend the expiration date of the original plan, and the
Division shall promptly notify the employer whether the plan modification has been approved
and, if approved, the effective date of modification.
(c) An employer is not required to request approval of a plan modification if the change
is not substantial, but the employer shall report every change to the plan to the Division promptly
and in writing. The Division may terminate an employer's plan if the employer fails to meet this
reporting requirement. If the Division determines that the reported change is substantial, the
Division shall require the employer to request a modification to the plan.
(d) The Division shall use its best efforts to provide for timely and flexible modifications.
The provisions of this section shall be liberally construed so as to provide the most flexibility for
employers and the Division in order to carry out the purposes of this Article.
"§ 96-51. Eligibility for short-time compensation.
An individual is eligible to receive short-time compensation with respect to any week only if
the individual is monetarily eligible for unemployment compensation, not otherwise disqualified
for unemployment compensation, and:
(1) During the week, the individual is employed as a member of an affected unit
under an approved short-time compensation plan, which was approved prior
to that week, and the plan is in effect with respect to the week for which
short-time compensation is claimed;
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Chapter relating to availability
for work and actively seeking work, the individual is available for the
individual's usual hours of work with the short-time compensation employer,
which may include, for purposes of this section, participating in training to
enhance job skills that is approved by the Division as employer-sponsored
training or training funded under the Workforce Investment Act of 1998; and
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual covered by a plan
is deemed unemployed in any week during the duration of the plan if the
individual's remuneration as an employee in an affected unit is reduced based
on a reduction of the individual's usual weekly hours of work under an
approved short-time compensation plan.
"§ 96-52. Benefits.
(a) The short-time compensation weekly benefit amount shall be the product of the
regular weekly unemployment compensation amount for a week of total unemployment
multiplied by the percentage of reduction in the individual's usual weekly hours of work.
(b) An individual may be eligible for short-time compensation or unemployment
compensation, as appropriate, except that no individual shall be:
(1) Eligible for combined benefits in any benefit year in an amount more than the
maximum entitlement established for regular unemployment compensation;
and
(2) Paid short-time compensation benefits for more than 52 weeks under a plan.
Page 4 House Bill 1149-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) The short-time compensation paid to an individual shall be deducted from the
maximum entitlement amount of regular unemployment compensation established for the
individual's benefit year.
(d) Provisions applicable to unemployment compensation claimants shall apply to
short-time compensation claimants to the extent that they are not inconsistent with the Program's
provisions. An individual who files an initial claim for short-time compensation benefits shall
receive a monetary determination.
(e) The following provisions apply to individuals who work for both a short-time
compensation employer and another employer during weeks covered by the approved short-time
compensation plan:
(1) If combined hours of work in a week for both employers do not result in a
reduction of at least ten percent (10%) or, if higher, the minimum percentage
of reduction required to be eligible for a short-time compensation benefit as
provided in this Article, of the usual weekly hours of work with the short-time
employer, the individual shall not be entitled to benefits under these short-time
compensation provisions.
(2) If the combined hours of work for both employers results in a reduction equal
to or greater than ten percent (10%) or, if higher, the minimum percentage
reduction required to be eligible for a short-time compensation employer, the
short-time compensation benefit amount payable to the individual is reduced
for that week and is determined by multiplying the weekly unemployment
benefit amount for a week of total unemployment by the percentage by which
the combined hours of work have been reduced by ten percent (10%) or, if
higher, the minimum percentage reduction required to be eligible for a
short-time compensation benefit as provided in this Article, or more of the
individual's usual weekly hours of work. A week for which benefits are paid
under this subdivision shall be reported as a week of short-time compensation.
(3) If an individual worked the reduced percentage of the usual weekly hours of
work for the short-time compensation employer and is available for all of his
or her usual hours of work with the short-time compensation employer, and
the individual did not work any hours for the other employer, either because
of the lack of work with that employer or because the individual is excused
from work with the other employer, the individual shall be eligible for
short-time compensation for that week. The benefit amount for the week shall
be calculated as provided in subsection (a) of this section.
(f) An individual who is not provided any work during a week by the short-time
compensation employer, or any other employer, and who is otherwise eligible for unemployment
compensation shall be eligible for the amount of regular unemployment compensation to which
the individual would otherwise be eligible.
(g) An individual who is not provided any work by the short-time compensation
employer during a week, but who works for another employer and is otherwise eligible, may be
paid unemployment compensation for that week subject to the disqualifying income or other
provision applicable to claims for regular compensation.
"§ 96-53. Charging short-time compensation benefits.
Short-time compensation shall be charged to employers' experience rating accounts in the
same manner as unemployment compensation is charged under this Chapter. Employers liable
for payments in lieu of contributions shall have short-time compensation attributed to service in
their employ in the same manner as unemployment compensation is attributed.
"§ 96-54. Extended benefits.
An individual who has received all of the short-time compensation or combined
unemployment compensation and short-time compensation available in a benefit year shall be
House Bill 1149-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
considered an exhaustee for purposes of extended benefits, and if otherwise eligible under those
provisions, shall be eligible to receive extended benefits.
"§ 96-55. Severability.
If any provision of this Article is found by the U.S. Department of Labor to be in violation of
federal law, the finding shall render the provision of this Article inoperative, but the finding shall
not invalidate the remaining provisions of this Article and is confined in its operation to the
specific provision found to be in violation of federal law."
SECTION 2. Effective July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Commerce, Division of Employment Security, the sum of one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000) in the 2026-2027 fiscal year for implementation of, and to educate
employers and employees about benefits under, the short-time compensation program established
by this act.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 6 House Bill 1149-First Edition